Missouri, session 2026, HB3136.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 376.1186, RSMo, is repealed, to read as follows:
[376.1186. 1. No state-based health benefit exchange may be
established, created, or operated within this state in order to implement Section
1311 of the federal health care act, 42 U.S.C. Section 18031, or any other
provision of the federal health care act that relates to the creation and operation
of a state-based health benefit exchange, unless the authority to create or
operate such an exchange is enacted into law through:
(1) A bill as prescribed by Article III of the Missouri Constitution;
(2) An initiative petition as prescribed by Article III, Section 50 of the
Missouri Constitution; or
(3) A referendum as prescribed by Article III, Section 52(a) of the
Missouri Constitution.
2. In no case shall the authority for establishing, administering, or
operating a state-based health benefit exchange in Missouri be based upon an
executive order issued by the governor of Missouri.
3. No department, agency, instrumentality or political subdivision of
the state of Missouri shall establish any program, promulgate any rule, policy,
guideline or plan or change any program, rule, policy or guideline to
implement, establish, create, administer or otherwise operate a state-based
health benefit exchange described in the federal health care act unless such
department, agency, instrumentality or political subdivision has received
statutory authority to do so in a manner consistent with subsection 1 of this
section. No department, agency, instrumentality or political subdivision of the
state of Missouri shall act as an eligible entity as described in Section 1311(f)
(3)(B) of the federal health care act to perform one or more of the
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3136 2
responsibilities of a state-based health benefit exchange unless authorized by
statute or a regulation validly promulgated pursuant to such statute.
4. No department, agency, instrumentality, or political subdivision of
this state shall apply for, accept or expend federal moneys related to the
creation, implementation or operation of a state-based health benefit exchange
or a federally facilitated health benefit exchange unless such acceptance or
expenditure is authorized by statute or an appropriations bill.
5. No department, agency, instrumentality, political subdivision, public
officer or employee of this state shall enter into any agreement or any
obligation to establish, administer, or operate a federally facilitated health
benefit exchange described in Section 1321(c)(1) of the federal health care act
unless such department, agency, instrumentality, political subdivision, public
officer or employee of this state has received statutory authority to enter into
such agreements or obligations. No department, agency, instrumentality,
political subdivision, public officer or employee of this state shall provide
assistance or resources of any kind to any department, agency, public official,
employee or agent of the federal government related to the creation or
operation of a federally facilitated health benefit exchange unless such
assistance or resources are authorized by state statute or a regulation
promulgated thereto or such assistance or resources are specifically required
by federal law.
6. Any taxpayer of this state or any member of the general assembly
shall have standing to bring suit against the state of Missouri or any official,
department, division, agency, or political subdivision of this state which is in
violation of this section in any court with jurisdiction to enforce the provisions
of this section. The court shall award attorney's fees, court costs, and all
reasonable expenses incurred by the taxpayer or member of the general
assembly if the court finds that the provisions of this section have been
violated. Such attorney's fees, court costs, and reasonable expenses shall be
paid from funds appropriated to the department, division, agency, or any
political subdivision of this state determined to have violated, in whole or in
part, the provisions of this section. In no case shall the award of attorney's
fees, court costs, or reasonable expenses be paid from the legal defense fund,
nor shall any department, division, agency, or political subdivision of this state
request, or be granted, additional appropriations in order to satisfy an award
made under this section.
7. As used in this section, the term "federal health care act" shall mean
the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, Public Law 111-148,
as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of
2010, Public Law 111-152, and any amendments thereto, or regulations or
guidance issued under such federal acts.
8. As used in this section, the term "state-based health benefit
exchange" means a governmental agency or nonprofit entity established by the
state of Missouri and not the federal government that meets the applicable
requirements of Section 1311 of the federal health care act and regulations
promulgated thereto and makes qualified health care plans available to
qualified individuals and qualified employers. The term "state-based health
benefit exchange" includes regional or other interstate exchanges and

HB 3136 3
subsidiary exchanges as described in Section 1311(f)(1) and (2) of the federal
health care act. The term "federally facilitated health benefit exchange" means
a health benefit exchange established and operated by the Secretary of Health
and Human Services under Section 1321(c)(1) of the federal health care act,
either directly or through agreement with a not-for-profit entity.]
✔